utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
рес/2,3,5,11,13,15,21,25,35,36,50,70,83,85,93,94,148,153,154,160,162,164,166,190,191,192,198,251,304,374,383,485,486,507,509,608,629,760,1051,1085,1102,1229,1250,1461,1468,1558,1602,2115,2121,2597,3162,3565,3566,4817,4972
боз/2,6,14,20,80,81,87,88,95,102,107,108,121,131,148,154,164,224,613,844,1238,1252,1442,1577,1611,2039,2376,2377,2732,3744,3745,3892,4151,4260
бот/2,7,30,50,80,90,107,108,121,131,156,180,310,316,323,330,336,345,347,453,471,472,521,710,728,798,844,930,970,1086,1090,1091,1106,1110,1119,1129,1134,1147,1190,1235,1290,1320,1424,1442,1462,1508,1518,1576,1624,2014,2058,3744,3745,3892,4151,4949
аме/25,31,96,113,141,172,308,324,395,429,502,558,613,624,675,853,1318,1355,1364,1405,1423,1504,1577,2039,2376,2377,2951,2952,4019,4259,4342,4879,4889
есе/3,21,25,54,397,631,649,790,1361,1581,2125,2428,3448
нек/3,35,36,48,93,359,949,957,1000,1362,1384,1654,1673,1862,2525,2747,3910,4294
шеј/3,6,12,13,27,31,81,92,465,1243,1751,3389,4435
кав/3,69,113,206,266,562,1243,1316,1362,1813,2344,2515,2530,2628,4055,4313,4988
шел/3,9,80,107,108,460,991
смес/1618,2104,2169,2484,2866,3155,3770,4883,4884
корс/218,340,588,957,2320,3621
шаин/2895
спид/4091
учес/428,494,614,637,1210,1592,3237,3513
бари/452,606,1141,1146,1301,1670,1795,2639,3327,3448,4173,4951
орде/5,10,19,24,27,29,35,52,79,82,84,203,255,369,574,973,1660,1853,1921,1945,2342,2890
долж/69,109,142,166,170,179,189,343,362,384,417,428,431,439,440,445,446,494,637,663,703,959,1012,1094,1210,1237,1306,1366,1367,1506,1725,1785,1801,2061,2084,2215,2216,2268,2359,2455,2456,2594,2595,2774,4131,4132,4133,4134,4135,4136,4137,4138
клопа/18,85,92,746,1000,1058,1074
облак/2,6,14,20,42,89,112,113,158,181,505,654,760,854,972,1051,1187,1681,1682,1752,1838,1839,1931,2201,2386,2387,3146,3236,3489,3754,3934,3935,3936,3937,3938,3939,3940,3941
кварт/2,6,81,159,209,232,340,588,695,785,888,1097,2320,3786
параф/209,224,294,296,362,473,549,616,686,703,1012,2084
годиш/27,170,428,637,767,967,3160,3917
астма/4,5,10,1369,1591,1754,3400,3905
никол/7,9,24,29,81,87,88,90,93,95,97,107,108,110,121,131,148,154,164,179,194,224,266,288,290,326,375,411,512,531,557,569,589,708,729,805,811,864,865,1122,1135,1529,1642,1864,1973,2113,2344,4101
шекер/81,87,88,95,154,164,179,180,512,703,844,1012,1238,1252,3028
залај/94,101,111,116,159,162,195,234,245,281,306,307,569
лозја/96,141,1200,3010
нагној/1,13,94,101,111,116,159,162,195
изгрев/2,6,34,106,116,158,159,162,181,195,223,234,245,266,281,306,307,312,334,346,354,355,356,372,394,407,418,422,423,427,436,437,438,441,447,448,449,455,474,475,479,483,484
симбол/3,6,21,198,304,375,397,421,490,530,583,631,645,765,779,790,807,863,1015,1047,1179,1230,1239,1385,1386,1542,1567,1699,1700,1701,1702,1703,1704,1705,1706,3403
страти/80,107,108,121,131,764,1242,3186,4688
тенисер/167,192
интерес/2,3,5,6,8,14,20,21,26,27,28,35,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,89,94,101,109,111,189,209,294,296,473,518,549,615,616,686,702,716,725,754,777,784,806,822,852,868,897,912,913,925,933,937,950,953,956,962,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,982,1005,1006,1007,1008,1084,1143,1351,2648,4616
престан/2,3,7,13,30,80,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,159,161,162,163,165,171,174,175,195,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,234,235,237,238,239,242,243,245,261,267,268,281,282,283,306,307,414,430,478,620,1342,1532,1572,1666,1667,1962,2016,2135,2218,2219,2220,2221,2222,2223,2436,3382,4557
наводен/3,13,21,80,93,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,161,163,165,171,174,175,197,199,214,215,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,269,282,283,300,311,338,340,389,410,467,569,588,1140,1415,1517,1548,1549,1665,1832,1833,1948,1949,1950,1951
операти/497,1315
разговар/2,106,158,159,162,181,195,234,245,266,281,306,307,312,334,346,354,355,356,418,427,455,474,475,479,483,484
распукува/1,2,5,8,12,13,18,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,56,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,72,74,75,76,77
романтичар/2,6,14,20,21,24,26,28,29,83,89,90,138,144,149,157,167,186,192,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,327,329,360,367
